Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1607
Life insurance contract; extension of special benefits; payment.

The group life insurance contract or contracts may permit the extension of special benefits, such as accidental death and dismemberment benefits, amounts of life insurance in addition to the amount provided in section 84-1605, and the extension of coverage to dependents. Any coverage under this section shall be borne solely by the employee.

Laws 1973, LB 516, § 5;

Laws 1974, LB 789, § 3;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 44-1624.